Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 2. Rights and Title of Ward

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of inter vivos gift by ward to guardian or conservator, 70 ALR4th 499.

§ 3-1-201.
Effect of appointment of guardian or conservator.

The appointment of a guardian or conservator does not constitute an adjudication that the ward lacks testamentary capacity.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Stated

in

In re Estate of Roosa, 753 P.2d 1028,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

§ 3-1-202.
Powers of the ward.

A ward who is a minor or a mentally incompetent person for whom a conservator has been appointed does not have the power to convey, encumber or dispose of property in any manner, except:

By will if he possesses the requisite testamentary capacity; or

As provided by W.S. 2-1-203(a),

13-7-302

and 34.1-4-405.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 3-1-203.
Title to ward's property.

Title to all property of the ward remains in the ward and is subject to the possession of the conservator and to the control of the court for the purposes of administration, sale or other disposition as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-1-204.
Conservator's right to possession.

The conservator shall:

Take possession of all the real and personal property of the ward;

Pay out of the ward’s estate the taxes assessed against the ward’s property; and

Collect the income realized from the ward’s property.

The conservator may bring an action to determine title to or to gain possession of the ward’s property.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-1-205.
Rights of proposed ward.

The proposed ward of any involuntary petition for guardianship or conservatorship shall have the right to:

Notice of the filing of the petition;

An opportunity for a hearing;

Be present at any hearing regarding the proposed guardianship or conservatorship;

Have a guardian ad litem appointed in accordance with Rule 17(c) of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, and to have counsel appointed upon order of the court; and

The least restrictive and most appropriate guardianship or conservatorship suitable to the proposed ward’s circumstances.

The rights in subsection (a) of this section may be exercised by the proposed ward, his legal counsel or guardian ad litem.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 114, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Attorney for Child Versus Guardian Ad Litem: Wyoming Creates a Hybrid, but is it a Formula for Malpractice?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 381 (1999).

§ 3-1-206.
Rights of ward.

The ward under any guardianship or conservatorship shall have the right to:

The least restrictive and most appropriate guardianship or conservatorship suitable to the ward’s circumstances, subject to the order of preference provided by W.S.

3-2-107

and

3-3-105

;

The least restrictive and most appropriate residential, educational and employment environments;

Freedom from inappropriate physical or chemical restraints; and

All other rights available to residents of any private or public facility to which the ward is admitted or program in which the ward participates subject to any order of the court.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 114, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.